North Dakota statutes. TITLE 38 Mining and Gas and Oil Production
CHAPTER 38-21 Exploration Fund

38-21-01.
Geophysical, geothermal, subsurface minerals, and coal exploration fund.

There is created a geophysical, geothermal, subsurface minerals, and coal exploration fund. The following must be deposited into the fund:

Fees collected under sections 38-08.1-04, 38-12-03, 38-12.1-05, and 38-19-04.

Money received from the forfeiture of bonds or other security required by section 38-08.1-03.1, 38-12-02, 38-12.1-04, or 38-19-03.

Money received by the industrial commission from any federal or state agency, or any other source, to satisfy the purposes for which the fund is established.

Money received for penalties imposed under section 38-08.1-07, 38-12-05, 38-12.1-08, or 38-19-07.

Money recovered from any person to recoup costs and expenses incurred by the industrial commission to satisfy any duty imposed by chapter 38-08.1, 38-12, 38-12.1, or 38-19.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 314, § 4.

38-21-02.
Fund uses.

Money in the fund may be used to pay costs and expenses incurred by the industrial commission to satisfy unfulfilled obligations imposed on persons regulated under chapters 38-08.1, 38-12, 38-12.1, and 38-19. To cure such obligations, the commission may enter contracts consistent with the requirements of section 38-08-04.4.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 314, § 4.

38-21-03.
Continuing appropriation — Cap.

All money collected under section 38-21-01 must be deposited in the fund established by that section. The fund must be maintained as a special fund and all money transferred into the fund is appropriated and must be used and disbursed solely for the purposes described in section 38-21-02. If, however, the fund reaches five hundred thousand dollars, any additional money collected under section 38-21-01 must be deposited in the general fund, provided there are no outstanding obligations to be paid by the fund.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 314, § 4.